Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Mississippi Alternative Fuel School Bus and Municipal Motor Vehicle Revolving Loan Fund

§ 57-1-421.
Mississippi Alternative Fuel School Bus and Municipal Motor Vehicle Revolving Loan Fund created; purpose; use of funds.

As used in this subsection:

“Alternative fuel” means compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, as defined in Section 27-59-3, and propane fuel when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle or motor vehicles on the highways of the state.

“Alternative fuel school bus” means a school bus propelled by alternative fuel either as a dedicated alternative fuel vehicle, as a bi-fuel vehicle using alternative fuel as one of its fuels, or as a dual-fuel vehicle using alternative fuel as one of its fuels.

“Conversion kit” means the fuel system equipment necessary in order to retrofit a motor vehicle propelled by gasoline, diesel or other fuel so that the motor vehicle may be converted or modified into an alternative fuel motor vehicle.

“Cost of qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property” means any of the following:

The actual cost per school bus paid by the school district for the purchase and installation of qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property described in paragraph (l)(i) of this subsection.

The incremental cost per school bus paid by the school district upon the purchase of an OEM alternative fuel school bus for the qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property (including installation) described in paragraph (l)(ii) of this subsection.

The cost of the qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property described in paragraph (l)(iii) of this subsection and its installation.

The cost of the qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property described in paragraph (l)(iv) of this subsection and its construction and installation. The cost directly related to a refueling station shall not include costs associated with exploration and development activities necessary for severing natural resources from the soil or ground.

“Fuel system equipment” means tanks, pumps, hoses, injectors, electronic controls and related supplies, materials, parts and components for the storage of alternative fuel as fuel for an alternative fuel school bus, the delivery of alternative fuel to the engine of an alternative fuel school bus, and the exhaust from an alternative fuel school bus of gases from combustion of alternative fuel used to propel an alternative fuel school bus, excluding equipment necessary for operation of a school bus on gasoline, diesel or any fuel other than alternative fuel.

“Incremental cost” means:

The stated MSRP of the fuel system equipment and its installation for an OEM alternative fuel school bus; or

If no separate MSRP is stated, the difference between the MSRP of the OEM alternative fuel school bus and the MSRP of the same make and model of school bus manufactured without the fuel system equipment but otherwise identically equipped.

When an OEM alternative fuel school bus is sold for less (or more) than its MSRP, the amount determined in subparagraph (i) or (ii) of this paragraph (f) shall be proportionately reduced (or increased) by the same percentage as the discount (or premium) on the MSRP, as applicable.

“School district” means a public school district.

“OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle” means an alternative fuel school bus manufactured by the original vehicle manufacturer (or its contractor) with the fuel system equipment installed as original equipment by the manufacturer (or its contractor) at the factory or at another installation site approved by the manufacturer (or its contractor).

“Motor vehicle” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 27-59-3.

“MSRP” means manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

“Original purchase” means the purchase directly from a dealer at retail of a new OEM alternative fuel school bus which has never been titled.

“Qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property” means any of the following:

A conversion kit which has not previously been used to retrofit any motor vehicle and is installed and results in a reduction in emissions.

The fuel system equipment on an OEM alternative fuel school bus which results in a reduction in emissions.

A refueling system installed at a governmental entity location for the nonpublic refueling with alternative fuel of the governmental entity’s alternative fuel school buses.

A refueling station located in the state and operated by a school district for refueling of alternative fuel motor vehicles owned by the school district.

Upgrades to a refueling system included in subparagraphs (iii) and (iv) of this paragraph (l).

Portable or mobile refueling systems.

“Reduction in emissions” means a reduction in atmospheric emissions from fuel consumption by an alternative fuel motor vehicle as demonstrated by certification of the fuel system equipment by the federal Environmental Protection Agency or the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality or any other test or standard recognized by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Refueling system” means compressors (whether used separately or in combination with cascade tanks), process piping, hoses, dispensing units at the point where alternative fuel is delivered as a fuel, meters and other parts and equipment and installation supplies and materials therefor that constitute a refueling system capable of dispensing alternative fuel into fuel tanks of alternative fuel motor vehicles for use as a fuel.

“Refueling station” means property constituting a facility operated for dispensing alternative fuel into fuel tanks of alternative fuel motor vehicles, which shall include:

A refueling system; and

A building or other structural components constructed or installed as part of and directly related to such refueling system.

“Retrofit” means the installation of a conversion kit in a school bus designed to operate on gasoline, diesel or other fuel in order to convert or modify the bus vehicle into an alternative fuel school bus.

“School bus” means a vehicle owned by a school district that is primarily used by the school district to transport students.

As used in this subsection:

“Alternative fuel” means compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, as defined in Section 27-59-3, and propane fuel when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle or motor vehicles on the highways of the state.

“Conversion kit” means the fuel system equipment necessary in order to retrofit a motor vehicle propelled by gasoline, diesel or other fuel so that the motor vehicle may be converted or modified into an alternative fuel motor vehicle.

“Cost of qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property” means any of the following:

The actual cost per vehicle paid by the municipality for the purchase and installation of qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property described in paragraph (l)(i) of this subsection.

The incremental cost per vehicle paid by the municipality upon the purchase of an OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle for the qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property (including installation) described in paragraph (l)(ii) of this subsection.

The cost of the qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property described in paragraph (l)(iii) of this subsection and its installation.

The cost of the qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property described in paragraph (l)(iv) of this subsection and its construction and installation. The cost directly related to a refueling station shall not include costs associated with exploration and development activities necessary for severing natural resources from the soil or ground.

“Fuel system equipment” means tanks, pumps, hoses, injectors, electronic controls and related supplies, materials, parts and components for the storage of alternative fuel as fuel for an alternative fuel motor vehicle, the delivery of alternative fuel to the engine of an alternative fuel motor vehicle, and the exhaust from an alternative fuel motor vehicle of gases from combustion of alternative fuel used to propel an alternative fuel motor vehicle, excluding equipment necessary for operation of a motor vehicle on gasoline, diesel or any fuel other than alternative fuel.

“Incremental cost” means:

The stated MSRP of the fuel system equipment and its installation for an OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle; or

If no separate MSRP is stated, the difference between the MSRP of the OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle and the MSRP of the same make and model of motor vehicle manufactured without the fuel system equipment but otherwise identically equipped.

When an OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle is sold for less (or more) than its MSRP, the amount determined in subparagraph (i) or (ii) of this paragraph (e) shall be proportionately reduced (or increased) by the same percentage as the discount (or premium) on the MSRP, as applicable.

“Municipality” means an incorporated city, town or village in the State of Mississippi.

“OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle” means an alternative fuel motor vehicle manufactured by the original vehicle manufacturer (or its contractor) with the fuel system equipment installed as original equipment by the manufacturer (or its contractor) at the factory or at another installation site approved by the manufacturer (or its contractor).

“Motor vehicle” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 27-59-3.

“MSRP” means manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

“Alternative fuel motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle propelled by alternative fuel either as a dedicated alternative fuel vehicle, as a bi-fuel vehicle using alternative fuel as one of its fuels, or as a dual fuel vehicle using alternative fuel as one of its fuels.

“Original purchase” means the purchase directly from a dealer at retail of a new OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle which has never been titled.

“Qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property” means any of the following:

A conversion kit which has not previously been used to retrofit any motor vehicle and is installed and results in a reduction in emissions.

The fuel system equipment on an OEM alternative fuel motor vehicle which results in a reduction in emissions.

A refueling system installed at a municipality location for the nonpublic refueling with alternative fuel of the municipality’s alternative fuel motor vehicles.

A refueling station located in the state and operated by a municipality for refueling of alternative fuel motor vehicles owned by the municipality.

Upgrades to a refueling system included in subparagraphs (iii) and (iv) of this paragraph (l).

Portable or mobile refueling systems.

“Reduction in emissions” means a reduction in atmospheric emissions from fuel consumption by an alternative fuel motor vehicle as demonstrated by certification of the fuel system equipment by the federal Environmental Protection Agency or the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality or any other test or standard recognized by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Refueling system” means compressors (whether used separately or in combination with cascade tanks), process piping, hoses, dispensing units at the point where alternative fuel is delivered as a fuel, meters and other parts and equipment and installation supplies and materials therefor that constitute a refueling system capable of dispensing alternative fuel into fuel tanks of alternative fuel motor vehicles for use as a fuel.

“Refueling station” means property constituting a facility operated for dispensing alternative fuel into fuel tanks of alternative fuel motor vehicles, which shall include:

A refueling system; and

A building or other structural components constructed or installed as part of and directly related to such refueling system.

“Retrofit” means the installation of a conversion kit in a motor vehicle designed to operate on gasoline, diesel or other fuel in order to convert or modify such motor vehicle into an alternative fuel motor vehicle.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish a revolving loan program to provide loans to (i) school districts for the purpose of assisting school districts with paying the cost of qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property and (ii) municipalities for the purpose of assisting municipalities with paying the cost of qualified alternative fuel motor vehicle fuel property. Loans made under this section shall bear no interest.

A school district or municipality desiring a loan under this section must submit an application to the Mississippi Development Authority. The application shall include:

A description of the purpose for which the loan is requested;

The amount of the loan requested; and

Any other information required by the Mississippi Development Authority.

Repayments of loans made under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the Mississippi Alternative Fuel School Bus and Municipal Motor Vehicle Revolving Loan Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Mississippi Alternative Fuel School Bus and Municipal Motor Vehicle Revolving Loan Fund,” which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be used by the Mississippi Development Authority for the purposes described in this section.

Monies in the fund which are derived from the proceeds of general obligation bonds may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the authority. Reimbursements made under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the Mississippi Development Authority shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 535, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013; Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.